Maine, session 132, LD194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §213, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1991, c. 536, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Court action. Any person who purchases or leases goods, services or property, real
or personal, primarily for personal, family or household purposes and thereby suffers any
loss of money or property, real or personal, as a result of the use or employment by another
person of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 207 or by any rule or
regulation issued under section 207, subsection 2 may bring an action either in the Superior
Court or District Court for actual damages, restitution and for such other equitable relief,
including an injunction, as the court determines to be necessary and proper. There is a right
to trial by jury in any action brought in Superior Court under this section.